Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 2 Abandonment and Nonsupport

11-2-1.
Abandonment or nonsupport of spouse or children.

Every person who shall abandon his or her spouse or children, leaving them in danger of becoming a public charge, or who shall neglect to provide according to his or her means for the support of his or her spouse or children, or who shall neglect or refuse to aid in the support of his or her spouse and/or children, except as otherwise provided for in §

11-2-1.1

, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 38; P.L. 1907, ch. 1447, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

11-2-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 304, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 1.

11-2-1.1.
Failure to pay child support.

Every person who is obligated to pay child support pursuant to an order or decree established by or registered with the family court pursuant to chapter 11 of title 15, who has incurred arrearage of past-due child support in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and who shall willfully thereafter, having the means to do so, fail to pay three (3) or more installments of child support in an amount previously set by the court, according to the terms previously set by the court, shall be guilty of a felony for each instance of failure to make the subsequent payments and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

Every person who has for a period of three (3) years willfully failed to pay any installments of child support in an amount previously set by the court, according to the terms previously set by the court, and who shall thereafter, having the means to do so, fail to pay three (3) or more installments of child support in an amount previously set by the court, according to the terms previously set by the court, shall be guilty of a felony for each instance of failure to make the subsequent payments and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

For purposes of this section, “subsequent payments” means those payments or installments due and owing after a person has incurred an arrearage of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as specified in subsection (a) of this section or those payments or installments due and owing after a person has failed to pay an installment for a period of three (3) years.

The court may in its discretion direct that the sentence be served pursuant to §

12-19-2(b)

.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 7; P.L. 2003, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 367, § 1.

11-2-2.
Desertion by leaving state — Decree as evidence.

Any husband or father who without just cause deserts his wife or minor child by going into another state, and leaves them or any or either of them without making reasonable provisions for their support, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. No civil proceeding in any court shall be held to be a bar to a prosecution pursuant to this section for desertion or nonsupport. In a prosecution pursuant to this section for desertion or nonsupport against a husband, a decree or judgment of any court in a proceeding in which the husband appeared or was personally served with process, establishing the right of the wife to live apart, or her freedom to convey and deal with her property, or the right to the custody of the children, shall be admissible and shall be prima facie evidence of that right.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 423, § 9; P.L. 1949, ch. 2238, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-2-2

.

11-2-3.
Complaints for nonsupport — Liability for costs.

The director of the department of human services or his or her designee, or chief of police, or director of public welfare of any city or town, or any officer that the town council of any town or the city council of any city may appoint for the purpose, may make a complaint against any person for any of the offenses mentioned in §

11-2-1

; and whenever any complaint shall be made by any of the officers listed in this subsection on account of the violation of §

11-2-1

, the officer complainant shall not be required to give surety for costs, but shall give his or her personal recognizance and be liable in his or her individual capacity.

Pursuant to §

11-2-1.1

, the department of human services, after an investigation to determine the extent of an arrearage and the ability of the obligor to pay the arrearage or some portion of it may refer the case to the attorney general for prosecution in the family court for the county in which the obligor resides, unless the person does not reside within the state, then the prosecution may be brought in the family court for Providence County.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 304, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 1.